Utah statutes.
53-10-304 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Narcotics and alcoholic beverage
enforcement -- Responsibility and jurisdiction.
The bureau shall:
(1)  have specific responsibility for the enforcement of all laws of the state
pertaining to alcoholic beverages and products;
(2)  have general law enforcement jurisdiction throughout the state;
(3)  have concurrent law enforcement jurisdiction with all local law
enforcement agencies and their officers;
(4)  cooperate and exchange information with any other state agency and with
other law enforcement agencies of government, both within and outside this
state, to obtain information that may achieve more effective results in the
prevention, detection, and control of crime and apprehension of criminals;
(5)  sponsor or supervise programs or projects related to prevention,
detection, and control of violations of:
(a)  Title 32A, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act;
(b)  Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substance Act;
(c)  Title 58, Chapter 37a, Utah Drug Paraphernalia Act;
(d)  Title 58, Chapter 37b, Imitation Controlled Substances Act;
(e)  Title 58, Chapter 37c, Utah Controlled Substance Precursor Act; and
(f)  Title 58, Chapter 37d, Clandestine Drug Lab Act; and
(6)  assist the governor in an emergency or  as the governor may require.
